Utah statutes.
73-3b-208.   Proposed new well -- Compliance with water well construction rules.

An applicant for a recharge permit or recovery permit who intends to construct a new well to recharge or recover artificially recharged water must comply with Sections 73-3-25 and 73-3-26, and rules adopted under those sections, regarding the construction of water wells.



Amended by Chapter 107, 2010 General Session

